Florida, session 2026, SB574.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 1012.02, Florida Statutes, is created to 19 read: 20 1012.02âStatewide strategic plan for the recruitment and 21 retention of speech-language pathologists and the provision of 22 quality services.â 23 (1)âThe Department of Education shall develop and maintain 24 a statewide strategic plan for recruiting and retaining speech 25 language pathologists and assuring that quality services are 26 provided to students with speech-language disabilities. At a 27 minimum, the plan must include, but is not limited to, all of 28 the following: 29 (a)âThe analysis of relevant data to determine the specific 30 staffing needs of school districts and charter schools. Such 31 analysis must be ongoing throughout the school year and must 32 include: 33 1.âThe total number of public schools, disaggregated by 34 school district and charter school. 35 2.âThe number of speech-language pathologists employed at 36 each school and school district, including speech-language 37 pathologists who are contracted personnel. 38 3.âThe number of employees and contracted personnel per 39 school district or charter school who are: 40 a.âDoctoral-level speech-language pathologists. 41 b.âMaster-level speech-language pathologists. 42 c.âBachelor-level speech-language therapists. 43 d.âSpeech-language pathology assistants. 44 4.âAn examination of the caseloads and compensation of such 45 employees and contracted personnel and a comparison of such 46 caseloads and compensation between school districts and charter 47 schools and in contiguous states. 48 (b)âTracking the changes in the number of employees and 49 contracted personnel listed in subparagraph (a)3. from year to 50 year, including resignations and retirements. 51 (c)âAn examination of strategies for addressing challenges 52 school districts and charter schools face in the recruitment and 53 retention of the employees and contracted personnel listed in 54 subparagraph (a)3., including, but not limited to: 55 1.âTuition assistance programs. 56 2.âContinuing education opportunities. 57 3.âExpanding opportunities for such employees and 58 contracted personnel to work full-time, part-time, or on another 59 hybrid schedule with continued benefits. 60 4.âEstablishing hybrid work environments. 61 5.âEstablishing differentiated pay for speech-language 62 pathologists. 63 6.âExpanding mentorships for speech-language pathologists 64 for newly employed speech-language pathologists. 65 (d)âAn estimation of the costs to implement the strategies 66 outlined in paragraph (c), including the extent to which 67 federal, state, and local funds could be used to support such 68 implementation. 69 (e)âThe development and implementation of a weighted 70 calculation methodology for determining a caseload and workload 71 plan for speech-language pathologists. The plan must be based on 72 an analysis of the activities and populations for which the 73 speech-language pathologists are responsible and, at a minimum, 74 must include sufficient time for all of the following: 75 1.âIndividualized therapeutic instruction and interventions 76 for students. 77 2.âDiagnostic and evaluation-specific speech, language, and 78 literacy. 79 3.âConsultation services and collaboration among staff 80 members. 81 4.âAttendance at individual education plan meetings and 82 other staff conferences, as appropriate. 83 5.âRequired documentation and reporting. 84 6.âMedicaid billing and related activities. 85 7.âResponse to student interventions. 86 (f)âThe amount of Medicaid revenue that is annually: 87 1.âGenerated by speech-language pathologist activities. 88 2.âObtained through speech-language pathologist activities 89 and is transferred to the school districtâs or charter schoolâs 90 general revenue fund. 91 3.âUsed for speech-language pathologistsâ pay supplements, 92 stipends, continued professional training, and therapeutic 93 materials. 94 (2)(a)âThe department shall create a survey for each school 95 district and charter school to complete to gather the data 96 required under subsection (1). 97 (b)âEach school district and charter school must complete 98 and submit such survey to the department no later than October 99 31 of each year. 100 (c)âNo later than November 30 of each year, the department 101 shall publish the statewide strategic plan on its website, which 102 includes the integration of school district and charter school 103 data and information, and provide an update on the departmentâs 104 progress in developing and implementing the statewide strategic 105 plan to the appropriate substantive committees of the Senate and 106 House of Representatives. 107 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.